Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-453
Conspiracy.

Any person subject to this code who conspires with any other person to commit an offense under this code shall, if one or more of the conspirators does an act to effect the object of the conspiracy, be punished as a court-martial may direct.

Laws 1969, c. 458, § 53, p. 1574.